Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1824
Department; official inspection and grade legend; adopt.

The department may adopt an official Nebraska inspection and grade legend, assign official inspection numbers to persons or establishments under inspection and require that such numbers be exclusive to them, and otherwise control the use of the official Nebraska legend. United States grade designations and authorized legends in connection therewith shall be used in accordance with the requirements of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 16, p. 191.